California statutes. Insurance Code
If at the expiration of the period designated in such requisition such alien insurer has failed to repair such deficiency, the commissioner may proceed against it under the provisions of Article 14, Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 1 as against an insurer whose condition is such that its further transaction of business will be hazardous to its policyholders, or creditors, or to the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 542.)
-------------------------------------------

1595.

Whenever an admitted alien insurer is required or permitted to deposit assets with a trustee for the benefit and security of its policyholders, or of its policyholders and creditors, in the United States, the trustee of any such trust hereafter created shall be a solvent bank or trust company in the United States acceptable to the commissioner and authorized to act as such trustee by the laws of any State or of the United States. All trusteed assets shall be continuously kept within the United States. Any such trust heretofore created and now existing and any such trust hereafter created and existing when such alien insurer seeks to be admitted, shall be continued in accordance with the terms of the instrument creating it, unless inconsistent with the provisions of this article, in which case said instrument shall, after reasonable notice to and hearing of the alien insurer by the commissioner, be amended to conform to the requirements of this article. No amendment of any deed of trust, whether heretofore or hereafter created, shall be effective unless approved in writing by the commissioner. If the trustees of any such trust heretofore created are natural persons, and if the number of such trustees is reduced, by death, resignation, or from any other cause, to less than three, then the commissioner shall require the substitution for such trustees of a solvent bank or trust company in the United States acceptable to him and authorized to act as such trustee by the laws of any State or of the United States. The commissioner may from time to time approve modifications of, or variations in, any deed of trust, which in his judgment are not prejudicial to the interests of the people of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

1596.

To satisfy the purposes of this article, any alien insurer admitted or seeking to be admitted is hereby authorized to make and execute a deed of trust by virtue of which any assets of an alien admitted insurer are held by a trustee as trusteed assets within the meaning of subdivision (c) of Section 1591. Such deed of trust shall:

(a) Vest the legal title to the trusteed assets in the trustee and its successors lawfully appointed, in trust for the benefit and security of all the policyholders, or of all the policyholders and creditors, of such alien insurer within the United States;

(b) Provide for the substitution of a new trustee in the event of a vacancy by death, resignation or from any other cause, subject to the approval of the commissioner;

(c) Require that the trusteed assets shall at all times be maintained within the United States as a trust fund separate and distinct from all other assets, and that the trustee shall continuously maintain a record at all times sufficient to identify such fund;

(d) Prescribe the conditions, satisfactory to the commissioner and not inconsistent with the purposes of this article, under which any or all income, earnings, dividends or interest accumulations of such fund may be paid over to the United States manager of such alien insurer; 

(e) Prohibit the withdrawal, other than as provided in accordance with subdivision (d), of any trusteed assets from such fund without the written approval of the commissioner, except as follows:

1. For the purpose of making general State deposits required by law in any State.

2. For the purpose of paying obligations due from such alien insurer to policyholders and creditors in the United States, and for the purpose of making special State deposits required by law in any State, if such payments and deposits do not impair the trusteed surplus in the United States of such alien insurer to an amount less than the minimum amount specified in Section 1594, and such fact is certified to the trustee by the insurer or its United States manager duly authorized for that purpose.

3. For the purpose of substituting other assets permitted by law and at least equal in value to those to be withdrawn, upon the specific written direction of the United States manager or an assistant United States manager or other representative in the United States of such alien insurer when duly empowered and acting pursuant to either general or specific written authority previously given or delegated by the board of directors thereof, except as provided in the paragraph numbered 5 of this subdivision.

4. For the purpose of transferring such assets to an official conservator, rehabilitator, or liquidator pursuant to an order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

5. In the case of an alien life insurer organized under the laws of the Dominion of Canada or of any province thereof, the provisions of this section applicable to the United States manager or an assistant United States manager or other representative in the United States of such alien insurer shall be deemed to refer to the president, vice president, secretary or treasurer of such insurer at its principal place of business in said Dominion or province thereof, when duly authorized for such purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

1596.5.

Trusteed assets may be held by a trustee in the name of a nominee of the trustee, when permitted by and in accordance with the law authorizing the trustee to act as trustee. For the purposes of this article, the trustee is deemed to have legal title to trusteed assets so held.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 162.)
-------------------------------------------

1597.

In respect of the appointment or substitution of a trustee in another state in which an admitted alien insurer is authorized to transact insurance, in respect of withdrawal of trusteed assets held in the other state (except withdrawals as provided in Section 1596), and in respect of the amendment of such deed of trust not affecting the interests or security of the beneficiaries thereof, written approval under any provision in the deed of trust which requires such written approval by the official of such other state, supervising insurance therein, shall be deemed compliance with any applicable approval requirements of Sections 1595 and 1596. Where an alien insurer organized under the laws of the Dominion of Canada or of any province thereof maintains trusteed assets in another state and under the deed of trust written approval is required by an official supervising insurance in any state in which such insurer is authorized to transact insurance and in which it heretofore maintained and hereafter continues to maintain a general state deposit at least equal in amount to the deposit required by Section 1582, written approval by such official in respect of the appointment or substitution of a trustee thereunder, in respect of withdrawal of such trusteed assets (except withdrawals as provided in Section 1596), and in respect of the amendment of such deed of trust not affecting the interests or security of the beneficiaries thereof, shall also be deemed compliance with any applicable approval requirements of Sections 1595 and 1596. The alien insurer shall furnish proof of approvals authorized by this section to and notify the commissioner in writing of such appointment or substitution, of the nature and extent of such withdrawal, and of the text of such amendment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 265.)
-------------------------------------------

1598.

The commissioner may from time to time examine the trusteed assets of any alien admitted insurer pursuant to Section 736, and may from time to time require the trustee holding trusteed assets of an alien admitted insurer to file with the commissioner a statement, in such form as he may prescribe, certifying such trusteed assets and the amounts thereof. Refusal or neglect on the part of such trustee to comply with such requirement shall be ground for the revocation of such alien insurer’s certificate of authority or for proceedings against it under the provisions of Article 14, Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

1599.

The commissioner shall require the payment of twenty-nine dollars ($29), in advance, as a fee for filing each certificate of a trustee required to be filed by Section 1592.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 33.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Agent for Service of Process [1600. - 1605.]

1600.

The commissioner shall require every foreign insurer, as a condition precedent to receiving and holding a certificate of authority, to file and maintain in the commissioner’s office a writing designating an agent for service of process. The agent designated may be any person residing in this state, including, but not limited to, any corporate officer of the insurer. The writing shall state the name of the agent and his or her place of business in this state with sufficient particularity so that he or she can readily be found by peace officers or process servers. Appointment of an agent reasonably available for service of papers, notice, proof of loss, summons or other process during business hours shall be continuously maintained by every admitted insurer subject to this article while it holds a valid and unrevoked certificate of authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 808, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1600.5.

An agent designated by a foreign insurer as provided in this article may file with the insurance commissioner a written statement of resignation as such agent which shall be signed and execution thereof shall be duly acknowledged by the agent. Thereupon, the authority of the agent to act in such capacity shall cease and the commissioner shall forthwith give written notice of such resignation by mail to the insurer addressed to its principal office as shown by his records. If an agent who has been appointed by a foreign corporation as provided in this article dies or resigns or removes his residence from the State of California, the insurer shall forthwith file with the commissioner an appointment of a new agent on a form provided by the commissioner for such purpose and pay the filing fee therefor, and such filing shall be deemed to revoke any prior designation of agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1917.)
-------------------------------------------

1601.

(a) A fee shall not be charged, except as included in the application for certificate of authority fee provided by Article 3 (commencing with Section 699) of Chapter 1, for filing the initial appointment of an agent for service of process under this article by an applicant for admission.

(b) Thereafter, the commissioner shall require the payment of seventy-two dollars ($72), in advance, as a fee for filing the appointment of an agent for service of process, or stipulation, or both by every admitted foreign or alien insurer pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 34.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1602.

Any notice provided by law or by a policy, and any proof of loss, summons or other process may be served on such agent in any action or other legal proceeding against the insurer, and such service gives jurisdiction over the person of such insurer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1603.

The person appointed and designated pursuant to Section 1600 shall be deemed in law a general agent, and shall for service of process be the principal agent of the insurer in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 808, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1604.

Every foreign insurer, as a further condition precedent to admission and in consideration thereof, shall file with the commissioner an agreement or stipulation, executed by the proper authorities of such insurer, in form and substance as follows:

“The (giving name of insurer) does hereby stipulate and agree, in consideration of the permission granted by the State of California to it to transact insurance business in this State, that if at any time it leaves this State, ceases to transact business in this State or is without an agent for service of process in this State, then in any case where such agent could be served, service may be made upon the Insurance Commissioner, and such service upon the commissioner shall have the same force and effect as if made upon the insurer.”

When a foreign insurer, prior to the date this code takes effect, has filed with the commissioner an agreement for service upon him pursuant to the provisions of section 616 of the Political Code as then in effect, such filing is a compliance with this section while such agreement remains in effect.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1605.

Service may be made upon the commissioner under the circumstances described in the agreement or stipulation provided for by this article and in the manner provided in Article 1 (commencing with Section 12919) of Chapter 2 of Division 3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 949.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Actions Against Nonadmitted Insurers [1610. - 1620.]

1610.

Any of the acts described in Section 1611, when effected in this State, by mail or otherwise, by a foreign or alien insurer which is nonadmitted at the time of the solicitation, issuance or delivery by it of contracts of insurance to residents of, or to corporations authorized to do business in, this State, is equivalent to and shall constitute an appointment by such insurer of the commissioner and his successor or successors in office to be its true and lawful attorney, upon whom may be served all lawful process in any action, suit, or proceeding instituted by or on behalf of an insured or beneficiary arising out of any such contracts of insurance, and any such act shall be signification of its agreement that such service of process is of the same legal force and validity as personal service of process in this State upon such insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 495.)
-------------------------------------------

1611.

The acts referred to in Section 1610 are:

(1) The issuance or delivery to residents of, or to corporations authorized to do business in, this State of contracts of insurance insuring (a) the lives or persons of residents of this State physically present herein at the time of such issuance or delivery or (b) property or operations located in this State.

(2) The solicitation of applications for such contracts.

(3) The collection of premiums, membership fees, assessments or other considerations for such contracts.

(4) Any other transaction of business arising out of such contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 495.)
-------------------------------------------

1612.

Such service of process may be made as provided in Article 1 (commencing with Section 12919) of Chapter 2 of Division 3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 949.)
-------------------------------------------

1616.

Before any nonadmitted foreign or alien insurer shall file or cause to be filed any pleading in any action, suit or proceeding instituted against it, the insurer shall either (1) procure a certificate of authority to transact insurance in this state; or (2) give a bond in the action, suit or proceeding in an amount to be fixed by the court sufficient to secure the payment of any final judgment which may be rendered in the action, suit, or proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 283.)
-------------------------------------------

1617.

The court in any action, suit, or proceeding, in which service of process is effected in the manner provided in Section 1612 may, in its discretion, order such postponement as may be necessary to afford the defendant reasonable opportunity to comply with the provisions of Section 1616 and to defend such action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 495.)
-------------------------------------------

1618.

Nothing in Section 1616 is to be construed to prevent a nonadmitted foreign or alien insurer from filing a motion to quash a writ or to set aside service thereof made in the manner provided in Section 1612 on the ground that such insurer has not done any of the acts described in Section 1611.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 495.)
-------------------------------------------

1619.

In any action against a nonadmitted foreign or alien insurer upon a contract of insurance issued or delivered in this State to a resident thereof or to a corporation authorized to do business therein, if the insurer has failed for 30 days after demand prior to the commencement of the action to make payment in accordance with the terms of the contract, and it appears to the court that such refusal was vexatious and without reasonable cause, the court may allow to the plaintiff a reasonable attorney fee and include such fee in any judgment that may be rendered in such action. Such fee shall not exceed 1212 percent of the amount which the court or jury finds the plaintiff is entitled to recover against the insurer, but in no event shall such fee be less than twenty-five dollars ($25). Failure of an insurer to defend any such action shall be deemed prima facie evidence that its failure to make payment was vexatious and without reasonable cause.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 495.)
-------------------------------------------

1620.

(a) The provisions of the preceding sections of this article shall not apply to any action, suit, or proceeding against any unauthorized foreign or alien insurer arising out of any contract of insurance effected in accordance with Section 1760, 1760.5, 1763, or 1763.1, or, if the contract is governed by and complies with the laws of the state in which the contract was entered. The provisions of Section 1610 shall apply to any action, suit, or proceeding under this section unless the insurer has designated an agent in California for service of process or the contract contains a provision designating a resident of this state or any firm of
 which one member is a resident of this state to be its true and lawful attorney upon whom may be served all lawful process in any action, suit, or proceeding.

(b) In any action, suit, or proceeding arising out of any such contract of insurance, the court may require the insurer to file a bond, in an amount sufficient to secure the payment of any final judgment which may be rendered unless one or more of the following are applicable:

(1) The insurer makes a showing satisfactory to
 the court that it maintains in a state of the United States funds or securities in trust or otherwise, sufficient and available to satisfy any such final judgment and that it will pay the judgment without requiring suit to be brought thereon in the state where the securities or funds are located.

(2) At the time the insurer files any pleading in any action, suit, or proceeding instituted against it, the insurer is an eligible surplus line insurer in accordance with Section 1765.1, unless by facts presented to the court there is created a reasonable doubt as to the present ability of the insurer to satisfy any final judgment in the action, suit, or proceeding. Upon request of a party or the court, the unauthorized foreign or alien insurer or reinsurer shall provide the court and the party requesting the bond with copies of documents relating to the financial condition of the insurer, including, but not limited to, copies of the insurer’s most
 recent annual statement and audited financial report and, where applicable, a certified copy of the trust agreement required by subdivision (b) of Section 1765.2 and a verified copy of the most recent quarterly statement or list of assets in the trust.

(3) With respect to a contract of reinsurance issued in accordance with Section 1760.5, the reinsurer has complied with the provisions of this code necessary to permit the ceding insurer to take credit on its financial statement for the reinsurance as set forth in Section 922.4 or 922.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 83, Sec. 7.   (AB 315)   Effective July 15, 2011.   Operative July 21, 2011, by Sec. 34 of Stats. 2011, Ch. 83.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Unauthorized Insurers False Advertising Process Act [1620.1. - 1620.7.]

1620.1.

(a) The purpose of this article is to subject to the jurisdiction of the commissioner and to the jurisdiction of the courts of this State, insurers not authorized to transact business in this State which place in or send into this State any false advertising designed to induce residents of this State to purchase insurance from insurers not authorized to transact business in this State. The Legislature declares it is in the interest of the citizens of this State who purchase insurance from insurers which solicit insurance business in this State in the manner set forth in the preceding sentence that such insurers be subject to the provisions of this article. In furtherance of such state interest, the Legislature in this article provides a method of substituted service of process upon such insurers and declares that in so doing, it exercises its power to protect its residents and also exercises powers and privileges available to the State by virtue of Public Law 15, 79th Congress of the United States, Chapter 20, 1st Session, S. 340, which declares that the business of insurance and every person engaged therein shall be subject to the laws of the several states; the authority provided in such sections to be in addition to any existing powers of this State.

(b) The provisions of this article shall be liberally construed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 297.)
-------------------------------------------

1620.2.

As used in this article (commencing with Section 1620.1):

(a) “Unfair Trade Practices Act” means Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 790) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(b) “Residents” means any person defined in Section 19 who is resident within the meaning of Section 30.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 297.)
-------------------------------------------

1620.3.

No unauthorized foreign or alien insurer shall make, issue, circulate or cause to be made, issued or circulated to residents of this State any estimate, illustration, circular, pamphlet, or letter, or cause to be made in any newspaper, magazine or other publication or over any radio or television station, any announcement or statement to such residents misrepresenting its financial condition or the terms of any contracts issued or to be issued or the benefits or advantages promised thereby, or the dividends or share of the surplus to be received thereon in violation of the Unfair Trade Practice Act, and whenever the commissioner shall have reason to believe that any such insurer is engaging in unlawful advertising, it shall be his duty to give notice of such fact by registered mail to the insurer and to the insurance supervisory official of the domiciliary state of the insurer. For the purpose of this section, the domiciliary state of an alien insurer shall be deemed to be the state of entry or the state of the principal office in the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 297.)
-------------------------------------------

1620.4.

If after 30 days following the giving of the notice mentioned in Section 1620.3 the insurer has failed to cease making, issuing, or circulating such false misrepresentations or causing the same to be made, issued or circulated in this State, and if the commissioner has reason to believe that a proceeding by him in respect to such matters would be to the interest of the public, and that the insurer is issuing or delivering contracts of insurance to residents of this State or collecting premiums on such contracts or doing any of the acts enumerated in Section 1620.5, he shall take action against the insurer under the Unfair Trade Practice Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 297.)
-------------------------------------------

1620.5.

(a) Any of the following acts in this State, effected by mail or otherwise, by any unauthorized foreign or alien insurer: (1) the issuance or delivery of contracts of insurance to residents of this State, (2) the solicitation of applications for such contracts, (3) the collection of premiums, membership fees, assessments or other considerations for such contracts, or (4) any other transaction of insurance business, is equivalent to and shall constitute an appointment by the insurer of the commissioner and his successor or successors in office, to be its true and lawful attorney, upon whom may be served all statements of charges, notices and lawful process in any proceeding instituted in respect to the misrepresentations set forth in Section 1620.3 under the provisions of the Unfair Trade Practice Act, or in any action, suit or proceeding for the recovery of any penalty therein provided, and any such act shall be signification of its agreement that the service of statement of charges, notices or process is of the same legal force and validity as personal service of the statement of charges, notices or process in this State, upon such insurer.

(b) Service of a statement of charges and notices under the Unfair Trade Practice Act shall be made by any deputy or employee of the Department of Insurance delivering to and leaving with the commissioner or some person in apparent charge of his office, two copies thereof. Service of process issued by any court in any action, suit or proceeding to collect any penalty under the act provided, shall be made by delivering and leaving with the commissioner, or some person in apparent charge of his office, two copies thereof. The commissioner shall forthwith cause to be mailed by registered mail one of the copies of the statement of charges, notices or process to the defendant at its last known principal place of business, and shall keep a record of all statements of charges, notices and process so served. Such service of statement of charges, notices or process shall be sufficient provided they shall have been so mailed and the defendant’s receipt or receipt issued by the post office with which the letter is registered, showing the name of the sender of the letter and the name and address of the person to whom the letter is addressed, and the affidavit of the person mailing the letter showing a compliance herewith are filed with the commissioner in the case of any statement of charges or notices, or with the clerk of the court in which the action is pending in the case of any process, on or before the date the defendant is required to appear or within such further time as may be allowed.

(c) Service of statement of charges, notices and process in any such proceeding, action or suit shall in addition to the manner provided in subsection (b) of this section be valid if served upon any person within this State who on behalf of such insurer is(1) Soliciting insurance, or(2) Making, issuing or delivering any contract of insurance, or(3) Collecting or receiving in this State any premium for insurance;and a copy of such statement of charges, notices or process is sent within 10 days thereafter by registered mail by or on behalf of the commissioner to the defendant at the last known principal place of business of the defendant, and the defendant’s receipt, or the receipt issued by the post office with which the letter is registered, showing the name of the sender of the letter, the name and address of the person to whom the letter is addressed, and the affidavit of the person mailing the same showing a compliance herewith, are filed with the commissioner in the case of any statement of charges or notices, or with the clerk of the court in which such action is pending in the case of any process, on or before the date the defendant is required to appear or within such further time as the court may allow.

(d) No cease or desist order or judgment by default under this section shall be entered until the expiration of 30 days from the date of the filing of the affidavit of compliance.

(e) Service of process and notice under the provisions of this article (commencing with Section 1620.1) shall be in addition to all other methods of service provided by law, and nothing in these sections shall limit or prohibit the right to serve any statement of charges, notices or process upon any insurer in any other manner now or hereafter permitted by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 297.)
-------------------------------------------

1620.6.

If any provision of this article (commencing with Section 1620.1) or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or application of this article which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this article are declared to be severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 297.)
-------------------------------------------

1620.7.

This article (commencing with Section 1620.1) may be cited as the Unauthorized Insurers False Advertising Process Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 313.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Production Agencies [1621. - 1758.993.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [1621. - 1624.]

1621.

An insurance agent is a person who transacts insurance, other than life, disability, or health insurance, on behalf of an admitted insurance company. The term “insurance agent” as used in this chapter does not include a life agent as defined in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 400, Sec. 6.   (AB 2782)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1622.

(a) A life and accident and health or sickness licensee is a person authorized to act on behalf of a life insurer or a disability insurer to transact any of the following:

(1) Life insurance.

(2) Accident and health insurance.

(3) Life and accident and health or sickness insurance.

(b) Licenses to act as a life and accident and health or sickness agent under this chapter shall be of the types set forth in Section 1626.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 7.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1623.

(a) An insurance broker is a person who, for compensation and on behalf of another person, transacts insurance other than life, disability, or health insurance with, but not on behalf of, an admitted insurer. It shall be presumed that the person is acting as an insurance broker if the person is licensed to act as an insurance broker, maintains the bond required by this chapter, and discloses, in a written agreement signed by the consumer, all of the following:

(1) That the person is transacting insurance on behalf of the consumer.

(2) A description of the basic services the person will perform as a broker.

(3) The amount of all broker fees being charged by the person.

(4) If applicable, the fact that the person may be entitled to receive compensation from the insurer, directly or indirectly, for the consumer’s purchase of insurance as a consequence of the transaction.

(b) If a transaction involves both a retail broker and a wholesale intermediary broker, the wholesale intermediary broker shall be deemed to have satisfied its disclosure obligations under this section if it provides written disclosure to the retail broker of the criteria set forth in paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) of subdivision (a).

(c) The presumption of broker status is rebutted as to any transaction in the admitted market in which any of the following is present:

(1) The licensee is appointed, pursuant to Section 1704, as an agent of the insurer for the particular class or type of insurance being transacted.

(2) The licensee has a written agreement with an insurer containing express terms that authorize the licensee to obligate the insurer without first obtaining notification from the insurer that the insurer has accepted, conditionally or unconditionally, the submitted risk.

(3) The licensee is authorized, pursuant to a written agreement with an insurer, to appoint other licensees as agents of the insurer, pursuant to Section 1704.

(4) The licensee is authorized, pursuant to a written agreement with an insurer, to pay claims on behalf of the insurer.

(d) In all other cases, the presumption of broker status is rebutted based on the totality of the circumstances indicating that the broker-agent is acting on behalf of the insurer.

(e) For purposes of this section, “totality of the circumstances” means evidence indicating whether a broker-agent was acting on behalf of the insurer or was acting on behalf of a third person. In determining the totality of circumstances, all relevant facts and circumstances shall be reviewed and the review is not limited to any particular fact or factors and this section does not require that any particular circumstance receive greater or lesser weight.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 400, Sec. 7.   (AB 2782)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1624.

“Insurance solicitor” means a natural person employed to aid a property and casualty broker-agent acting as an insurance agent or insurance broker in transacting insurance other than life, disability, or health.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 321, Sec. 13.   (AB 1391)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Comprehensive Definitions [1625. - 1630.]

1625.

(a) A property licensee or a casualty licensee is a person authorized to act as an insurance agent, broker, or solicitor, and a property broker-agent license or a casualty broker-agent license is a license so to act.

(b) Licenses to act as a property broker-agent under this chapter shall entitle the licensee to transact insurance coverage on the direct or consequential loss or damage to property of every kind.

(c) Licenses to act as a casualty broker-agent shall entitle the licensee to transact insurance coverage against legal liability, including that for death, injury, disability, or damage to real or personal property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 411, Sec. 8.   (AB 1416)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1625.5.

(a) A personal lines licensee is a person authorized to transact automobile insurance, as defined in Section 660, including insurance for recreational vehicles used for noncommercial purposes, personal watercraft insurance, residential property insurance, as defined in Section 10087, including earthquake and flood insurance, inland marine insurance covering personal property, and umbrella or excess liability insurance providing coverage when written over one or more underlying automobile or residential property insurance policies, and a personal lines broker-agent license is a license to so act.

(b) A license under this section shall be applied for and renewed, following successful
 completion of a qualifying examination on this code, ethics, and products sold under the license, in the same manner as is provided in this chapter for a license to act as a property broker-agent or a casualty broker-agent, except as provided in subdivision (c) or where provided otherwise.

(c) A person licensed as a personal lines agent who makes an application to the commissioner to become a property broker-agent or a casualty broker-agent pursuant to Section 1625 shall do all of the following:

(1) Submit an application on a form provided by the commissioner.

(2) Complete prelicensing education as specified in Section 1749.

(3) Take and pass a qualifying examination pursuant to Section 1676.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for a personal lines license:

(1) “License term” for a personal lines license means all of that two-year period beginning as described in either subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 1629, as applicable, and ending the second succeeding year on the last calendar day of the month in which the initial license was issued.

(2) “License year” for a personal lines license shall be determined for each entity as follows:

(A) Upon initial licensing, the license year starts on the date the license is issued.

(B) Subsequently, each license year starts the first day of the month following the month in which the initial license was issued.

(C) A
 license year ends the following calendar year on the last calendar day of the month in which the initial license was issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 411, Sec. 9.   (AB 1416)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1625.55.

(a) A limited lines automobile insurance agent is a person authorized to transact automobile insurance, as defined in Section 660. A limited lines automobile insurance agent license is a license to so act.

(b) A license under this section shall be applied for and renewed, following successful completion of a qualifying examination on this code, ethics, and products sold under the license, in the same manner as provided in this chapter for a license to act as a property broker-agent or a casualty broker-agent.

(c) The commissioner shall require in advance a fee for filing any applications, renewals thereof, or changes in
 outstanding licenses, or for the filing of other required documents at an amount designated in this chapter for a personal lines licensee, and for filing any notice of appointment or notice of termination at an amount specified in Section 1751.3.

(d) A person licensed as a limited lines automobile insurance agent who makes an application to the commissioner to become a property broker-agent or a casualty broker-agent pursuant to Section 1625 or a personal lines agent pursuant to Section 1625.5 shall do all of the following:

(1) Submit an application on a form provided by the commissioner.

(2) Take and pass a qualifying examination pursuant to Section 1676.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 566, Sec. 2.   (AB 943)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1625.56.

“License year” for a limited lines automobile insurance agent shall be determined as follows:

(a) Upon initial licensing, the license year starts on the date the license is issued.

(b) Subsequently, each license year starts the first day of the month following the month in which the initial license was issued.

(c) A license year ends the following calendar year on the last calendar day of the month in which the initial license was issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 271, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1625.57.

“License term” for a limited lines automobile insurance agent means all of that two-year period beginning as described in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 1625.56, as applicable, and ending the second succeeding year on the last calendar day of the month in which the initial license was issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 271, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)